Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2375.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1703-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1703-A. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Artificial intelligence" shall mean a machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments. Systems use machine and human-based inputs to:(1) perceive real and virtual environments;(2) abstract perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(3) use model inference to formulate options for information or action.* * *Section 2. Section 1715-A(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1715-A. Charter School Requirements.--(a) Charter schools shall be required to comply with the following provisions:* * *(13) A charter school may not adopt an instructional model that relies on artificial intelligence instead of professional employes to provide direct instruction to students.* * *Section 3. Section 1717-A(c) of the act is amended to read:Section 1717-A. Establishment of Charter School.--* * *(c) (1) An application to establish a charter school shall be submitted to the local board of school directors of the district where the charter school will be located by November 15 of the school year preceding the school year in which the charter school will be established except that for a charter school beginning in the 1997-1998 school year, an application must be received by July 15, 1997. In the 1997-1998 school year 20260HB2375PN3180 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 only, applications shall be limited to recipients of fiscal year 1996-1997 Department of Education charter school planning grants.(2) A local board of school directors may not consider or accept an application to establish a charter school with an instructional model that relies on artificial intelligence instead of professional employes to provide direct instruction to students.(3) The refusal by a local board of school directors to consider or accept an application based on an instructional model that relies on artificial intelligence shall not be subject to appeal to the appeal board.* * *Section 4. Section 1729-A(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1729-A. Causes for Nonrenewal or Termination.--(a) During the term of the charter or at the end of the term of the charter, the local board of school directors may choose to revoke or not to renew the charter based on any of the following:* * *(7) Adoption of an instructional model that relies on artificial intelligence instead of professional employes to provide direct instruction to students.* * *Section 5. Section 1741-A(a)(1) and (3)(ii) of the act are amended to read:Section 1741-A. Powers and duties of department.(a) Powers and duties.--The department shall:(1) The following:20260HB2375PN3180 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Receive, review and act on applications for the creation of a cyber charter school and have the power to request further information from applicants, obtain input from interested persons or entities and hold hearings regarding applications.(ii) The department may not consider or accept an application to establish a cyber charter school with an instructional model that relies on artificial intelligence instead of professional employees to provide direct instruction to students. The department's refusal to consider or accept an application under this subparagraph shall not be subject to appeal to the appeal board.* * *(3) Revoke or deny renewal of a cyber charter school's charter under the provisions of section 1729-A.* * *(ii) Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, the department may, after notice and hearing, take immediate action to revoke a charter if:(A) a material component of the student's education as required under this subdivision is not being provided; [or](B) the cyber charter school has failed to maintain the financial ability to provide services as required under this subdivision[.]; or(C) the cyber charter school has adopted an instructional model that relies on artificial intelligence instead of professional employees to provide direct instruction to students.20260HB2375PN3180 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 6. Section 1743-A of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1743-A. Cyber charter school requirements and prohibitions.* * *(j) Prohibited use of artificial intelligence.--A cyber charter school may not adopt an instructional model that relies on artificial intelligence instead of professional employees to provide direct instruction to students.Section 7. Section 1745-A(d) of the act is amended to read:Section 1745-A. Establishment of cyber charter school.* * *(d) Application.--An application to establish a cyber charter school shall be submitted to the department by October 1 of the school year preceding the school year in which the cyber charter school proposes to commence operation. The department may not consider or accept an application to establish a cyber charter school with an instructional model that relies on artificial intelligence instead of professional employees to provide direct instruction to students. The department's refusal to accept or consider an application based on an instructional model that relies on artificial intelligence shall not be subject to appeal to the appeal board.* * *Section 8. Section 2603-B of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2603-B. Powers and Duties of the Board.--* * *(l) The board shall promulgate regulations to prohibit a public school entity from using an instructional model that 20260HB2375PN3180 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relies on artificial intelligence instead of professional employes to provide direct instruction to students. For purposes of this subsection, the term "artificial intelligence" shall mean the same as under section 1703-A.Section 9. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2375PN3180 - 6 - 12345